Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3309
Insurer; acts prohibited.

An insurer shall not contract itself to practice law in any manner, nor shall the insurer control or attempt to control the attorney in the exercise of his or her professional judgment.

Laws 1979, LB 52, § 9.